West Virginia, session 2025, SB531.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: Article 2. Crimes Against the Person. §61-2-15a. Assault, battery on athletic officials; penalties. (a) If any person commits an assault, as defined in §61-2-9(b) of this code, to the person of an athletic official during the time the official is acting as an athletic official, or traveling to and from an organized sporting event as an athletic official, the offender is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not more less than $500 nor more than $1,000, or confined in jail not more than six months, or both fined and confined.(b) If any person commits a battery, as defined in §61-2-9(c) of this code, against to the person of an athletic official during the time the official is acting as an athletic official, or traveling to and from an organized sporting event as an athletic official, the offender is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not more less than $1,000 nor more than $2,000, or confined in jail not more than twelve 12 months, or both fined and confined.(c) For the purpose of this section, "athletic official" means a person at a sports an organized sporting event who enforces the rules of that event, such as an umpire, or referee, or a person who supervises the participants, such as a coach, or other athletic staff. Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home